District of Columbia statutes.
32-1542

Retaliatory actions by employer prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any employer or his duly authorized agent to discharge or in any other manner discriminate against an employee as to his employment because such employee has claimed or attempted to claim compensation from such employer, or because he has testified or is about to testify in a proceeding under this chapter. Any employer who violates this section shall be liable to a penalty of not less than $100 or more than $1,000, as may be determined by the Mayor. All such penalties shall be paid to the Mayor for deposit in the special fund as described in § 32-1540, and if not paid may be recovered in a civil action brought in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia. Any employee so discriminated against shall be restored to his employment and shall be compensated by his employer for any loss of wages arising out of such discrimination; provided, that if such employee ceases to be qualified to perform the duties of his employment, he shall not be entitled to such restoration and compensation. The employer alone and not his carrier shall be liable for such penalties and payments. Any provision in an insurance policy undertaking to relieve the employer from liability for such penalties and payments shall be void.

History

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 43, 27 DCR 2503

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-342.